District of Columbia statutes.
42-3632

Action for possession of rental unit used as a drug haven.

Expired.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-139, § 3, 37 DCR 2645
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-176, § 2(b), 43 DCR 4234
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 19(a), 44 DCR 1232

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2559.2.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Drug House Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-446, December 5, 1996, 43 DCR 6664).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 8-139

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3631.